Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2086.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 40-102.1 of Title 47, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. As used in this section, “illegal alien” means any person


not a citizen or national of the United States who willfully and


without permission enters and remains in the United States without


having first obtained legal authorization to enter such.


B. 1. Every law enforcement officer who, in the regular course


of duty, investigates or receives a report of a traffic collision


involving an illegal alien shall prepare a written report on the


collision on the standard collision report form supplied by the

Req. No. 2497 Page 1


Department of Public Safety. The report shall be forwarded by the


law enforcement agency preparing the report to the Department of


Public Safety within twenty (20) days of the collision.


2. The report of the collision shall be made available for


public viewing by the Department of Public Safety within ten (10)


days of the receipt of such.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2497 MSBB 1/15/2026 12:15:21 PM































Req. No. 2497 Page 2